District of Columbia statutes.
10-1103.06

Removal of vault — Notice to owner; immediate action.

Notwithstanding the provisions of the preceding section, whenever the Mayor finds that any vault or vault opening in such condition as to be imminently dangerous to persons or property, he shall immediately notify the owner, agent, or other person in charge of the private property abutting the public space in which such vault or vault opening is located, to cause such vault or vault opening to be made safe and secure. The person or persons so notified shall be allowed until 12:00 noon of the day following the service of such notice in which to commence making such vault or vault opening safe and secure; provided, that in a case where the public safety requires immediate action the Mayor may enter upon the private property abutting the public space in which such vault or vault opening is located, with such workmen and assistants as may be necessary, and cause such vault or vault opening to be made safe and secure. In any case in which the Mayor performs any work under the authority of this section, the cost to the District of performing such work shall be charged against the private property abutting the public space in which such vault or vault opening is located, and shall be collected in the manner provided by § 10-1103.07.

Oct. 17, 1968, 82 Stat. 1160, Pub. L. 90-596, title III, § 307
1981 Ed., § 7-1012.
1973 Ed., § 7-913.
This section originated at a time when local government powers were delegated to the District of Columbia Council and to a Commissioner of the District of Columbia. The District of Columbia Self-Government and Governmental Reorganization Act, 87 Stat. 818, § 711 ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.11), abolished the District of Columbia Council and the Office of Commissioner of the District of Columbia. These branches of government were replaced by the Council of the District of Columbia and the Office of Mayor of the District of Columbia, respectively. Accordingly, and also pursuant to § 714(a) of such Act ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.14(a)), appropriate changes in terminology were made in this section.